Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1107
Recognizance forfeited; set aside; conditions.

The court may direct that a forfeiture of the recognizance be set aside, upon such conditions as the court may impose, if it appears that justice does not require the enforcement of the forfeiture.

Laws 1953, c. 88, § 2, p. 259.

District court has authority to remit a part or all the penalty of a bail bond in its discretion, to be exercised as to what is right and equitable under circumstances of the individual case. State v. Kennedy, 193 Neb. 472, 227 N.W.2d 607 (1975).

Discretion rests in district court to remit all or any part of forfeited bail bond. State v. Reed, 178 Neb. 370, 133 N.W.2d 591 (1965).

Action under this section is to be measured in the light of the requirements of justice. State v. Seaton, 170 Neb. 687, 103 N.W.2d 833 (1960).

Court may direct that forfeiture of recognizance be set aside. State v. Konvalin, 165 Neb. 499, 86 N.W.2d 361 (1957).